District of Columbia statutes.
28-2303

Assignment of nonnegotiable contract.

An owner of a nonnegotiable written agreement for the payment of money, including a nonnegotiable bill of exchange and a promissory note, or for the delivery of personal property, an open account, debt, and demand of a liquidated character, except a claim against the United States or the salary of a public officer, may assign it in writing, and the assignee may maintain an action thereon in his own name.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 669, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
1973 Ed., § 28-2303.
1981 Ed., § 28-2303.
Retirement of public school teachers, nonassignability of annuities, see § 38-2001.17.
Liens on motor vehicles or trailers, assignment, see §§ 50-1208 and 50-1209.
Judicial procedure, counterclaims, effect of assignment, see § 13-502.